District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.02

Waiver of examination.

The board shall waive the examination requirement of § 3-1207.01(a)(2) and (c)(2) for any applicant for licensure as a dietitian or nutritionist who presents evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant meets the qualifications required by § 3-1207.01(a)(1) or § 3-1207.01(c)(1) and has been employed in the practice of dietetics or nutrition on a full-time or substantially full-time basis for at least 3 of the last 5 years immediately preceding March 25, 1986, provided that application for the waiver is made within 24 months of March 25, 1986.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 702, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 11, 1988, D.C. Law 7-87, § 2(a), 35 DCR 162
1981 Ed., § 2-3307.2.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985 Temporary Amendment Act of 1987 (D.C. Law 7-20, July 25, 1987, law notification 34 DCR 5351).
Near the middle of the section, “(c)(1)” was substituted for “(b)(1)”, to correct an error in D.C. Law 6-99.